Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 12 Interstate Compacts

Cross references. —

For duties of state engineer relative to water, see §§

41-2-211

,

41-3-308

,

41-4-507

.

As to rights to foreign waters, see §§

41-3-201

through

41-3-215

.

As to cooperation and agreements between Utah and Montana with reference to water and water rights, see §

41-4-103

.

As to diversion or storage of water for use in adjoining state, see §§

41-4-104

,

41-4-105

.

As to interstate streams commission, see §§

41-11-101

through

41-11-206

.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

For duties of attorney general as to interstate streams, under direction of governor, see §§

9-1-605

,

41-11-101

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).